Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.948

Fire services trust fund—Expenditures.

Money from the fire services trust fund may be expended for the following purposes:

(1) Training of fire service personnel, including both classroom and hands-on training at the state fire training center or other locations approved by the chief of the Washington state patrol through the director of fire protection services;

(2) Maintenance and operation at the state's fire training center near North Bend. If in the future the state builds or leases other facilities as other fire training centers, a portion of these moneys may be used for the maintenance and operation at these centers;

(3) Lease or purchase of equipment for use in the provisions of training to fire service personnel;

(4) Grants or subsidies to local jurisdictions to allow them to perform their functions under this section;

(5) Costs of administering these programs under this section;

(6) Licensing and enforcement of state laws governing the sales of fireworks; and

(7) Development with the legal fireworks industry and funding of a statewide public education program for fireworks safety.

[ 1995 c 369 s 22; 1991 c 135 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.63A.377.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1995 c 369: See notes following RCW 43.43.930.

Intent—Effective date—Severability—1991 c 135: See notes following RCW 43.43.946.